North Carolina, session 2025, HB942.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be allocated as a directed grant to the North Carolina Coalition Against Sexual
Assault, a nonprofit corporation, to be used to allocate funds to partner organizations, including
domestic violence organizations, rape crisis centers, and child advocacy centers, to use for victim
advocacy.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H942-v-1*